public/third-party/apertium-translations/apertium-spa.spa.metadix
<pardef n="ró/mper__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>mpe</l>       <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cánta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpan</l>      <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpa</l>       <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
</pardef>
    

<e lm="romper">          <p><l>ró</l>        <r>ro</r></p><par n="ró/mper__vblex"/></e>
